Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF993.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 203B.081, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Temporary locations. (a) A county auditor or municipal clerk authorized under section 203B.05 to administer voting before election day may designate additional polling places with days and hours that differ from those required by section 203B.085. A designation authorized by this subdivision must be made at least 47 days before the election. The county auditor or municipal clerk must provide notice to the secretary of state at the time that the designations are made. (b) At the request of a federally recognized Indian Tribe with a reservation in the county, the county auditor must establish an additional polling place for at least one day on the Indian reservation on a site agreed upon by the Tribe and the county auditor that is accessible to the county auditor by a public road. (c) At the request of a postsecondary institution or the student government organization of a postsecondary institution in the county or municipality, the county auditor or a municipal clerk authorized to administer absentee voting under section 203B.05 must establish an additional temporary polling place for the state general election or the odd-year city general election for at least one day at a location agreed upon by the institution and the county auditor or municipal clerk that: (1) is accessible to the public; (2) satisfies the requirements of state and federal law; and (3) is on the institution's campus or is within one-half mile of the institution's campus and is reasonably accessible to the institution's students. A request must be made no later than May 31 before an election and the request is valid only for that election. This paragraph only applies to a postsecondary institution that provides on-campus student housing to 100 or more students. Nothing in this paragraph prevents the county auditor or municipal clerk from engaging in a dialogue with the entity that made the request regarding potential alternative locations for a temporary polling place that does not meet the requirements of clause (3). An entity that made a request for a temporary polling place may withdraw its request by notifying the county auditor or municipal clerk. new text begin (d) Within five business days of designating an additional polling place under this subdivision, the county auditor or municipal clerk must post on the county's or municipality's website the address of the polling place and the dates and times the polling place will be available for voting. Within five business days of receiving the notice described in paragraph (a), the secretary of state must post on the secretary of state's website the address of the polling place and the dates and times the polling place will be available for voting. new text end